District of Columbia statutes.
3-1210.02

Misrepresentation.

Unless authorized to practice a health occupation under this chapter, a person shall not represent to the public by title, description of services, methods, or procedures, or otherwise that the person is authorized to practice the health occupation in the District.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1002, 33 DCR 729

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3310.2.